Washington statutes.
RCW 27.44.020

Examination permitted—Removal to archaeological repository.

Any archaeologist or interested person may copy and examine such glyptic or painted records or examine the surface of any such cairn or grave, but no such record or archaeological material from any such cairn or grave may be removed unless the same shall be destined for reburial or perpetual preservation in a duly recognized archaeological repository and permission for scientific research and removal of specimens of such records and material has been granted by the state historic preservation officer. Whenever a request for permission to remove records or material is received, the state historic preservation officer shall notify the affected Indian tribe or tribes.

[ 1985 c 64 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 6; 1941 c 216 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 3207-11.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.